Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-547
City airport authority board; members; terms; qualifications.

Each airport authority board created pursuant to the Cities Airport Authorities Act in cities of the primary, first, and second classes and in villages shall consist of five members. Except for members initially appointed pursuant to section 3-502, members of the board shall serve for terms of six years and shall be nominated and elected in the manner provided by law for the election of officers of the city concerned and shall take office at the same time as the officers of such city. One member shall be elected at the first general city election after creation of the authority, two members at the second general city election after creation of the authority, and two members at the third general city election after the creation of the authority. The members shall meet the qualifications found in such section.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 143.

Cities Airport Authorities Act, see section 3-514.